Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.aff
SFX X Y 116
SFX X   üir  uo           üir
SFX X   üir  uas          üir
SFX X   üir  uan          üir
SFX X   üir  uamos        üir
SFX X   üir  uades        üir
SFX X   üir  ua           üir
SFX X   zar  ces          zar
SFX X   zar  cen          zar
SFX X   zar  cemos        zar
SFX X   zar  cedes        zar
SFX X   zar  ce           zar
SFX X   uir  o            guir
SFX X   uir  as           guir
SFX X   uir  an           guir
SFX X   uir  amos         guir
SFX X   uir  ades         guir
SFX X   uir  a            guir
SFX X   uer  o            guer
SFX X   uer  as           guer
SFX X   uer  an           guer
SFX X   uer  amos         guer
SFX X   uer  ades         guer
SFX X   uer  a            guer
SFX X   uar  ües          guar
SFX X   uar  üen          guar
SFX X   uar  üemos        guar
SFX X   uar  üedes        guar
SFX X   uar  üe           guar
SFX X   r    s            ar
SFX X   r    s            [aü]ir
SFX X   r    s            [^o]er
SFX X   r    s            [^g]uir
SFX X   r    o            air
SFX X   r    n            er
SFX X   r    n            ar
SFX X   r    mos          guir
SFX X   r    mos          er
SFX X   r    mos          ar
SFX X   r    mos          [^auü]ir
SFX X   r    des          guir
SFX X   r    des          er
SFX X   r    des          ar
SFX X   r    des          [^auü]ir
SFX X   r    as           air
SFX X   r    an           air
SFX X   r    amos         air
SFX X   r    ades         air
SFX X   r    a            air
SFX X   ir   i            [aü]ir
SFX X   ir   i            [^g]uir
SFX X   oer  óis          oer
SFX X   oer  ói           oer
SFX X   ir   ímos         [aü]ir
SFX X   ir   ímos         [^g]uir
SFX X   ir   ídes         [aü]ir
SFX X   ir   ídes         [^g]uir
SFX X   ir   o            [^g]uir
SFX X   ir   o            [^acuü]ir
SFX X   ir   es           guir
SFX X   ir   es           [^auü]ir
SFX X   ir   en           ir
SFX X   ir   e            guir
SFX X   ir   e            [^auü]ir
SFX X   ir   as           [^g]uir
SFX X   ir   as           [^acuü]ir
SFX X   ir   an           [^g]uir
SFX X   ir   an           [^acuü]ir
SFX X   ir   amos         [^g]uir
SFX X   ir   amos         [^acuü]ir
SFX X   ir   ades         [^g]uir
SFX X   ir   ades         [^acuü]ir
SFX X   ir   a            [^g]uir
SFX X   ir   a            [^acuü]ir
SFX X   er   é            er
SFX X   er   o            [^cu]er
SFX X   er   e            [^o]er
SFX X   er   as           [^cu]er
SFX X   er   an           [^cu]er
SFX X   er   amos         [^cu]er
SFX X   er   ades         [^cu]er
SFX X   er   a            [^cu]er
SFX X   cir  zo           cir
SFX X   cir  zas          cir
SFX X   cir  zan          cir
SFX X   cir  zamos        cir
SFX X   cir  zades        cir
SFX X   cir  za           cir
SFX X   cer  zo           cer
SFX X   cer  zas          cer
SFX X   cer  zan          cer
SFX X   cer  zamos        cer
SFX X   cer  zades        cer
SFX X   cer  za           cer
SFX X   car  ques         car
SFX X   car  quen         car
SFX X   car  quemos       car
SFX X   car  quedes       car
SFX X   car  que          car
SFX X   ar   á            ar
SFX X   ar   ues          gar
SFX X   ar   uen          gar
SFX X   ar   uemos        gar
SFX X   ar   uedes        gar
SFX X   ar   ue           gar
SFX X   ar   o            ar
SFX X   ar   es           [^g]uar
SFX X   ar   es           [^cguz]ar
SFX X   ar   en           [^g]uar
SFX X   ar   en           [^cguz]ar
SFX X   ar   emos         [^g]uar
SFX X   ar   emos         [^cguz]ar
SFX X   ar   edes         [^g]uar
SFX X   ar   edes         [^cguz]ar
SFX X   ar   e            [^g]uar
SFX X   ar   e            [^cguz]ar
SFX X   ar   a            ar

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   r    mentos       [ai]r
SFX M   r    mento        [ai]r
SFX M   er   imentos      er
SFX M   er   imento       er
