Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.dic
abacelar/YXMp
abalastrar/YXp
abalofar/YXp
abanear/YXpM
abarcar/nYXMpD
abarouchar/YXp
abarrotar/YXpM
abeberar/YXp
abespiñar/YXp
abobadar/YXp
abolar/pYXM
aborbullar/YXp
abrasar/pYX
achegar/YXMp
acidrar/YXp
acirrar/YXnMp
acogular/pYX
acomodar/YXDpcvM
acoplar/YXMp
acoutar/YXp
afastar/YXDMp
agoirar/pYXD
aguilloar/YXxMDp
alagar/YXMDp
alapar/YXp
alugar/YXp
anotar/YXp
apoderar/pYXM
apracer/KSXp
arroutar/YXp
asesorar/YXpM
ateigar/pYXM
atordoar/nYXMDp
atrasar/YXp
avasalar/YXMDpn
avisar/YXMDp
basear/YXp
bocexar/YXDp
cair/YXDnM
capturar/YXp
cebar/pYX
chiscar/YXp
codificar/YXp
comercializar/YXDvp
conculcar/YXp
considerar/YXSpR
constrinxir/vnYXMp
consultar/YXp
convidar/YXp
cursar/YXp
debater/YXp
definir/cRYXDvp
der/Xnp
desmaiar/YXp
desovar/M
diagnosticar/pYX
disfarzar/YXp
distrair/YXMDC
drogar/pYX
eludir/vYXp
empoar/YXp
encerrar/pYXM
encontrar/pYXR
encrespar/YXMDp
enderezar/vYXMp
enfermar/YXp
engrandecer/YXpDM
entorpecer/YXp
entumecer/nYXMDp
envellecer/YXp
escaiolar/YXp
escoller/YXp
esgaravellar/YpX
espetar/pYX
esquecer/YXMvp
estruchar/YXp
esvaecer/YXMDp
evanxelizar/YXp
exixir/YXvnp
facilitar/YXp
fervellar/YXp
flagrar/pYXn
foguear/YXp
forxar/YXp
fumegar/YXp
gabar/xYXDMp
garantir/YXDp
herdar/YXp
incidir/YRnXp
instalar/YXRp
internacionalizar/YoXp
invitar/cYXDp
isolar/YonXDMp
lañar/YXp
levantar/YXDpnM
licenciar/YXp
lograr/YXp
manifestar/pYXnc
maturar/YXp
submeter/M
mobilizar/IYXp
munxir/pYXMD
obstruir/YXov
orlar/YXp
pantolar/YXp
pechar/pYX
perturbar/pcYX
positivar/YXp
prelucir/YXnp
probar/pYXR
queixar/pYX
quitar/pYXDoM
ratear/YXp
reflexionar/YXp
refuxiar/YXp
restar/YXnp
rodar/pYX
ruñar/YXp
secar/YXRp
sisar/pYX
sofrer/YXMp
somar/YXp
substantivar/YXop
sulfatar/YXp
suster/nKpM
tapar/YXp
televisar/YpX
torturar/pYX
trair/YXDCMo
transcorrer/YXp
tripular/YXp
desunir/X
vendar/pYX
vituallar/YXp
votar/pnYXc
xexuar/YXp
abalanzar/YXMp
abandeirar/YXMp
abaratar/YXp
abardar/pYX
abatuxar/pYX
abicar/YXp
ablactar/pYXo
aboar/YXMp
aboletar/pYXM
aboligar/pYX
aboubar/YXpM
acadar/YXp
acañar/YXMDp
acimar/YXp
acollerar/YXp
acondicionar/YMXp
acordar/YXpMn
acrescentar/YXMp
acumular/vYXMcp
administrar/YXpc
adormecer/nYXDpM
aducir/YvncXp
afluir/YXn
alforxar/YXp
aliñar/YXMDp
amañar/YXp
amedrontar/pYXDM
anoxar/pYX
apostar/YXp
aprezar/YXDMp
arquivar/YXp
arrefecer/vpYXDM
arriar/YXMp
asasinar/YXDp
atacar/nYXp
atrofiar/pYX
axitar/YXp
berrar/YXp
bombardear/YXDvMp
buscar/YXDp
descair/YM
casar/YXMp
cativar/YXnpo
choutar/YXp
cociñar/YXp
cometer/YXp
computar/YXvpc
conceber/vYXMp
concorrer/YXp
contratar/vcYXpno
recoñecer/M
cruzar/YXMp
decair/YXM
degolar/YXp
delincuir/YXn
desalmar/YXpM
deslizar/vYXp
dirimir/YXpn
discorrer/YMXp
disecar/YXp
dosificar/YXp
eloxiar/YXp
empatar/YXp
empobrecer/YXMDp
encamiñar/YXp
endurar/pYX
enfeitar/YXDMp
enfrentar/YXpM
engordar/pYX
engradar/YMpX
engrelar/YpX
enlevar/oYXMp
ensangüentar/pYX
enzopelar/YXp
esbranquizar/YXp
escarnecer/YXvMp
escoltar/pYX
esfiar/YXp
espaventar/YXp
estampar/YXp
estrangular/YXp
exibir/oYXDp
facultar/YXp
fechar/YXMDp
fertilizar/YXp
financiar/YXMDp
fruir/ocYX
galeguizar/YXp
governar/YXnp
hesitar/onYXp
imiscuir/YX
indignar/YXp
inducir/pYXDM
inseminar/pYX
interpretar/cYXp
subir/YM
lamber/xYXDp
lembrar/YXp
lubricar/YXp
martirizar/YXp
merecer/YXMp
mexericar/YXp
minorar/pYcX
moldear/YXp
moxegar/YXp
nacionalizar/vcYDpnX
normativizar/pYvXDo
ocultar/pYXcv
oxidar/YXpo
padecer/nYXDpM
parar/pYXR
pausar/pYX
persuadir/YXvpDM
poxar/YXp
presidir/YXpn
prologar/pYX
rabuñar/YXp
recomprar/YXp
remoiñar/YXp
respaldar/YXp
revestir/vM
robustecer/YXp
santigar/YXp
sincronizar/pYX
solidarizar/pYX
suprir/YXvDpM
teitar/YXp
testar/YXMp
torgar/YXp
trevoar/pYX
vacinar/YXop
velexar/YXp
vencellar/YXvpnM
xustizar/YXp
abairrar/YXMp
abananar/pYX
abarregar/YXMp
abastar/nYXMp
abillar/YXp
abotoar/oYXDp
acabar/YXMp
acedar/YXp
acometer/YXvDMp
adicionar/YXCp
afogar/pYXS
aleitar/oYMXp
alendar/YXp
amarelecer/YXpM
amedoñar/YXp
anovar/YXpM
aparellar/YXDpM
apresurar/YXMp
aproveitar/vYXMp
arredar/YMXp
arremedar/YXp
arrepiar/YXnMvp
atoar/YXp
atrever/YXMp
aturdir/YXMDp
baptizar/YXp
calcar/YXRp
carregar/pYXS
chamar/YXMp
cinguir/YXDvMp
recoller/M
comparecer/nYXMp
compartir/YXDMpv
comportar/YXpM
configurar/YDpcX
continuar/pcYX
contrair/vnYCSXM
criticar/vYXp
dedicar/YXDpc
derruir/YXMD
desentender/M
deseñar/YDXp
desfasar/pYXM
desprazar/YMpX
dexear/YXp
dispensar/vYXDoMp
embrullar/pYXMD
encetar/pYXMD
encomendar/YXp
enforcar/YXMp
engrazar/pYX
envidar/YXp
enxofrar/pYXDM
escoar/YXp
esgazar/vYXDMpn
esmorecer/YXp
estrumar/YXp
esvair/YMX
exercitar/YXp
fasquiar/YXp
fincar/pYXM
formalizar/cYXp
fusionar/YXp
harmonizar/YXp
inculpar/YXp
invernar/YXp
lesar/YXp
matinar/YXp
mistificar/pYX
namorar/pYXM
narcotizar/YXp
obstar/YXp
papar/vYXp
pelar/pYX
plasmar/YXp
pratear/YXp
pregar/YXSMp
procesar/pYXD
promulgar/YXop
pronunciar/YXMvp
protrair/vYXM
quebrantar/YXDpM
quilificar/oYXp
recadar/YXop
renovar/pYXc
rexoubar/pYXD
rotar/cYXp
seducir/vYXMp
semellar/YXnp
sobrar/nYXp
solapar/YXMp
sucar/YXp
tintar/pYX
trabucar/YXMpD
trebellar/YXp
urbanizar/YXop
verter/YUpRX
xoguetear/YXp
abaixar/xYXDMp
abaloufar/pYX
abaluartar/YXMp
abandallar/pYXM
abarracar/YXpM
abemolar/YXp
abofetear/YXDp
abubiar/YXp
acelerar/DcYXMp
acocorar/nYXMp
acoforar/YXp
acolchetar/YXMDp
acreditar/YDvXp
adoecer/pYXM
adsorver/pYXon
afundir/YXMDvp
agradecer/YXp
aloxar/YXSp
amorear/pYX
aniquilar/YXDMpc
apedrexar/YXDpM
apreciar/YXDcvpM
arranxar/YXMp
arrasar/YXMDp
arreguizar/YXMp
arrepender/pYX
asoballar/YXp
atribular/vYXDnp
bracexar/pYXMD
brillar/nYXp
castrar/YXpo
cercear/YXMpD
cifrar/YXp
conceder/YXp
consumir/vYXDcp
cuidar/YXp
cumprir/pYXMIvD
decrecer/YXMnp
delongar/YXDMp
desalixar/YXp
desdobrar/vM
desencadear/nDM
deslindar/YXMDp
deslumbrar/pYXDnM
detectar/YXp
diluir/vonYXM
diversificar/oYXp
eliminar/vYDXcp
emprazar/pYX
engazar/YXp
enovelar/YXMp
ensinar/YXDvpM
entregar/pYX
escalar/YXp
esnaquizar/YXp
estancar/vpYXM
estar/vMcp
estarrecer/nYXMDp
estender/YXp
esventar/YXp
expulsar/YXp
ferver/pYXR
formigar/YXp
fundar/YXcpM
gafar/YXp
gradear/YXMp
homoxeneizar/poYX
inabilitar/YXp
insinuar/YXp
irrorar/YXp
listar/YXp
lucir/SpYXM
malbaratar/YXDp
remar/XY
menoscabar/YXp
mortificar/YXp
mover/YXMvp
ocupar/cYXp
paciscar/pYX
papaguear/YMXp
penalizar/SpYX
petrolear/YXp
planexar/YXDMp
planificar/pYXo
posicionar/YXpcM
predicar/nYXMDop
primar/YXp
progredir/YMKp
quilometrar/YXp
receitar/YXp
render/vYXMp
resarcir/YXpM
resumir/XD
rexer/YXDM
rexurdir/DM
rocar/YXp
secuenciar/YXp
sobresair/YXM
soprar/YXp
suscitar/RYXp
temperar/pYXMD
titular/pdYoX
triangular/pYX
vergallar/YXp
xestionar/pYX
abafar/xYXMDpnv
abagoirar/YXMp
abalar/YXDpnMv
abandar/YXMp
abarrocar/YXp
abastardar/pYXM
abastecer/YXMDp
abaular/YXMp
abeirar/YXpM
abeixoar/pYX
aboirar/pYX
abrutecer/YXpM
aceitar/vonYXMDp
acobadar/YXp
acolchoar/YXMp
acougar/pYXS
adxuntar/YXp
afear/vYXMp
afeizoar/pYXM
agravar/vnYXpcM
agurgullar/pYXM
amortecer/YXp
aportar/oYXMp
apoucar/YXMDp
aprazar/XYMp
armar/YXDoMpn
desarmar/YX
arroubar/YXMp
atafegar/YXnMp
atar/pYXS
atuar/YXpM
babexar/nYXp
botar/pYXS
cindir/YXp
combinar/YXcp
concluir/YX
construir/YXCRv
corrixir/vYXMp
crecer/YXpnM
derreter/YXp
derrubar/YXpM
desfrutar/YXp
desnortear/YXDpM
devolver/YXp
disputar/pYX
dourar/YXMDp
electrificar/YXp
embrazar/YXpDM
empachar/YXp
enfollar/pYXM
engadir/YXp
engranzar/YXMDp
enlear/nYMXDp
enraizar/YXMDvp
enrolar/YXDMp
enrugar/YXp
esbarar/YpX
esclarecer/YXDMp
escurecer/pYXDvM
esfaragullar/YXp
eternizar/YXp
expurgar/YXDp
falsear/YXpM
ferranchar/YXp
finxir/YXDpM
fortalecer/YXMp
fraudar/voYXp
goivar/pYX
guturalizar/YXop
imitar/pcYXDv
indagar/YXp
inquirir/YDXMp
inscreber/YXRp
irritar/vcYDpXn
lanzar/YXMp
louquear/YXp
mediar/YXRp
nacer/nYXMRp
nimbar/YXp
oferecer/vYXMDp
opar/YXp
ordenar/YMpXcD
pacer/YXp
pagar/YXMp
repartir/Mvc
pensar/YXDpMn
pestanexar/YXp
pormenorizar/YXp
proliferar/YXcp
purificar/YXp
requerer/YM
rebentar/oYXDp
rendibilizar/oYXp
restabelecer/YXMp
resurxir/nM
retrotrair/YX
rexeitar/YXMvp
rozar/YxXMDp
saloucar/YpX
sedimentar/poYX
sistematizar/pYX
subliñar/YXp
timbrar/YXp
retrair/YXM
transitar/pYX
vaguear/pYX
velar/YoXDMp
vencer/YDpXvM
vingar/YXDp
xurdir/RYXp
zunir/YpXMD
